Hawaii statutes.
[§342B-4] Other powers of department and
director not affected. The powers, duties, and functions vested in the
department and director under this chapter shall not be construed to affect in
any manner the powers, duties, and functions vested in the department and
director under any other law. Rules shall be adopted pursuant to chapter 91.
[L 1992, c 240, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next